Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2041.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, No.150), known as the Childhood Blood Lead Test Act, is amended to read:AN ACTProviding for blood lead assessment and testing of certain children and pregnant women by health care [providers] practitioners; imposing duties on the Department of Health; and requiring certain health insurance policies to cover 12345678910111213141516171819 blood lead tests.Section 2. Section 3(3) of the act is amended to read:Section 3. Legislative purpose.The purposes of this act are:* * *(3) To [encourage] require the testing of all children in this Commonwealth by two years of age so that prompt diagnosis and treatment, as well as the prevention of harm, are possible.Section 3. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Cost-sharing." The share of health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an insured pays out of pocket. The term includes deductibles, coinsurance, copayments and similar charges. The term does not include premiums, balance-billed amounts from an out-of-network health care provider or the cost of noncovered services.* * *"Health care practitioner." As defined in section 103 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.* * *Section 4. Sections 5 and 6(a) and (b)(2) of the act are amended to read:Section 5. Lead poisoning prevention, assessment and testing 20250HB2041PN2611 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements.[(a) Lead testing for children.--(1) The following apply:(i) A health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure in an individual patient by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age.(ii) If a patient has never been tested in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age, a health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in an individual patient between 24 months and 72 months of age.(iii) A health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient's parent or legal guardian understands the risks and benefits of blood lead testing prior to obtaining consent.(2) If a patient's parent or legal guardian consents to blood lead testing for the patient under paragraph (1) and the results of a capillary blood lead test indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test after obtaining the consent of the patient's parent or legal guardian.](a.1) Lead testing requirements for children.--(1) A health care practitioner shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient under the health care 20250HB2041PN2611 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practitioner's care receives at least one blood lead test by 12 months of age and a second blood lead test by 24 months of age.(2) If a patient has never been tested by 24 months of age, a health care practitioner shall ensure that the patient receives at least one blood lead test between 24 months and 72 months of age.(3) If a capillary blood lead test indicates an elevated blood lead level, a health care practitioner shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.(b) Lead exposure risk assessment and testing requirements for pregnant women.--A health care [provider] practitioner shall consider possible lead exposure in individual pregnant women by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(c) Reporting.--Health care [providers] practitioners and laboratories shall comply with reporting regulations as specified in 28 Pa. Code § 27.34 (relating to reporting cases of lead poisoning).(d) Communication of risks and benefits.--Notwithstanding subsection (e), a health care practitioner shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a child's parent or legal guardian, or a woman under prenatal care, understands the benefits and risks of a blood lead test.(e) Nonapplicability.--The requirements under this section 20250HB2041PN2611 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall not apply if a child's parent or legal guardian, or a woman under prenatal care, objects to the blood lead test for any reason. A health care practitioner shall document the objection in writing and include the objection in the patient's medical record. Before performing a blood lead test under this section, the health care practitioner shall notify the child's parent or legal guardian, or the woman under prenatal care, of the option to object to a blood lead test.Section 6. Duties of department.(a) Comprehensive educational program.--The department shall conduct a public information campaign to inform parents of young children, physicians, nurses and other health care [providers] practitioners of the lead assessment and testing requirements of this act.(b) Distribution of literature about childhood lead poisoning.--* * *(2) Educational materials shall be available at no cost and shall be developed for specific audiences, including health care [providers] practitioners, homeowners, landlords and parents or caregivers.Section 5. Section 7(a) and (b) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 7. Blood lead assessment and testing coverage.(a) General rule.--A health insurance policy or government program covered under this section shall provide to covered individuals or recipients blood lead tests as follows:(1) In the case of individuals or recipients who are pregnant, one blood lead test per pregnancy [if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from 20250HB2041PN2611 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists].(2) In the case of individuals or recipients who are:(i) under two years of age, at least [one blood lead test] two blood lead tests by 24 months of age in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics [and, if]; and(ii) between 24 months of age and 72 months of age, at least one blood lead test by 72 months of age if the individual or recipient has never been tested by 24 months of age.(3) If the result of the blood [level] lead test covered under paragraph (1) or (2) indicates an elevated blood lead level, another blood lead test by venipuncture [within 12 weeks of the blood level test in which the elevated blood lead level was indicated.] in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.[(b) Copayments, deductibles and coinsurance.--Coverage under this section shall be subject to copayment, deductible and coinsurance provisions and any other general exclusions or limitations of a health insurance policy or government program to the same extent as other medical services covered by the policy or program are subject to these provisions.](b.1) Cost-sharing.--A blood lead test covered under subsection (a) shall not be subject to cost-sharing.* * *Section 6. The amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates 20250HB2041PN2611 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, the amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department or the Federal Government, the amendment of section 7 of the act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2041PN2611 - 7 - 123456789101112